en: Table Skirts
xx: Table Skirts
cs: Rautové sukně
da: Bordskørter
de: Tischvorhänge
es: Faldas para mesas
fr: Jupes de table
it: Gonne per tavoli da buffet
ja: テーブルスカート
nl: Tafelrokken
no: Bordskjørt
pl: Falbany stołowe
pt: Saias de mesa
ru: Юбки для стола
sv: Bordskjolar
tr: Masa Etekleri

en: Tablecloths
xx: Tablecloths
cs: Ubrusy
da: Bordduge
de: Tischtücher
es: Manteles
fr: Nappes, Nappe, Sous-nappes, Sous-nappe
it: Tovaglie
ja: テーブルクロス
nl: Tafelkleden
no: Bordduker
pl: Obrusy
pt: Toalhas de mesa
ru: Скатерти
sv: Bordsdukar
tr: Masa Örtüleri

en: Towels
xx: Towels
cs: Ručníky
da: Håndklæder
de: Handtücher
es: Toallas
fr: Serviettes
it: Teli per bagno
ja: タオル
nl: Handdoeken
no: Håndklær
pl: Ręczniki
pt: Toalhas
ru: Полотенца
sv: Handdukar
tr: Havlular

en: Terrycloth towels, Terry cloths, Terry towels
be: Махровая тканіна
ca: Pelfa
cs: Smyčková tkanina
da: Frotté
de: Frottee
eo: Felpoj
es: Felpa
et: Frotee
eu: Felpa
fa: پارچه حوله‌ای
fi: Frotee
fr: Éponge
it: Spugna
ja: タオル地
ko: 테리클로스
nb: Frotté
nl: Badstof
pl: Tkanina frotte
pt: Felpa
ru: Махровая ткань
sl: Frotirna tkanina
sv: Frotté
uk: Махрова тканина
zh: 毛巾布

en: Bath Towels & Washcloths
xx: Bath Towels & Washcloths
cs: Osušky a žínky
da: Badehåndlæder og vaskeklude
de: Badhandtücher & Waschlappen
es: Toallas de baño y manoplas
fr: Serviettes de bain et gants de toilette, Serviette de bain
it: Asciugamani
ja: バスリネン
nl: Badhandboeken en washandjes
no: Badehåndklær og vaskekluter
pl: Ręczniki kąpielowe i myjki
pt: Toalhas de banho e toalhinhas de lavabo
ru: Банные полотенца и махровые мочалки
sv: Badhanddukar och tvättlappar
tr: Banyo Havluları ve Sabunluklar

en: Terrycloth bath towels and washcloths
sv: Frottébadhanddukar och -tvättlappar

en: Beach Towels
xx: Beach Towels
cs: Plážové osušky
da: Strandhåndklæder
de: Strandtücher
es: Toallas de playa
fr: Serviettes de plage, Drap de plage
it: Asciugamani da spiaggia
ja: ビーチタオル
nl: Strandlakens
no: Strandhåndklær
pl: Ręczniki plażowe
pt: Toalhas de praia
ru: Пляжные полотенца
sv: Strandhanddukar
tr: Plaj Havluları

en: Kitchen Towels
xx: Kitchen Towels
cs: Kuchyňské ručníky
da: Viskestykker
de: Geschirrtücher
es: Paños de cocina
fr: Torchons, Torchon
it: Asciugamani da cucina
ja: ふきん
nl: Keukendoeken
no: Kjøkkenhåndklær
pl: Ściereczki kuchenne
pt: Toalhas de cozinha
ru: Кухонные полотенца
sv: Kökshanddukar
tr: Mutfak Havluları

en: Parasols & Rain Umbrellas
xx: Parasols & Rain Umbrellas
cs: Slunečníky a deštníky
da: Parasoller og paraplyer
de: Sonnen- & Regenschirme
es: Sombrillas y paraguas
fr: Parasols et parapluies
it: Parasole e ombrelli
ja: 傘・日傘
nl: Parasols en paraplu's
no: Parasoller og paraplyer
pl: Parasole
pt: Sombrinhas e guarda-chuvas
ru: Зонты
sv: Parasoll och paraplyer
tr: Güneş Şemsiyeleri ve Yağmur Şemsiyeleri

en: Plants
xx: Plants
cs: Rostliny
da: Planter
de: Pflanzen
es: Plantas
fr: Plantes
it: Piante
ja: 植物
nl: Planten
no: Planter
pl: Rośliny
pt: Plantas
ru: Растения
sv: Växter
tr: Bitkiler

en: Aquatic Plants
xx: Aquatic Plants
cs: Vodní rostliny
da: Vandplanter
de: Wasserpflanzen
es: Plantas acuáticas
fr: Plantes aquatiques
it: Piante acquatiche
ja: 水生植物
nl: Waterplanten
no: Vannplanter
pl: Rośliny wodne
pt: Plantas aquáticas
ru: Водные растения
sv: Vattenväxter
tr: Su Bitkileri

en: Flowers
xx: Flowers
cs: Květiny
da: Blomster
de: Blumen
es: Flores
fr: Fleurs
it: Fiori
ja: 花
nl: Bloemen
no: Blomster
pl: Kwiaty
pt: Flores
ru: Цветы
sv: Blommor
tr: Çiçekler

en: Indoor & Outdoor Plants
xx: Indoor & Outdoor Plants
cs: Pokojové a zahradní květiny
da: Indendørs og udendørs planter
de: Grünpflanzen\, Büsche & Sträucher
es: Plantas de interior y exterior
fr: Plantes d'extérieur et d'intérieur
it: Piante da interno ed esterno
ja: 観葉植物
nl: Kamer- en tuinplanten
no: Innendørs- og utendørsplanter
pl: Rośliny doniczkowe i ogrodowe
pt: Plantas de interiores e exteriores
ru: Комнатные и уличные растения
sv: Inomhus- och utomhusväxter
tr: İç ve Dış Mekan Bitkileri

en: Bushes & Shrubs
xx: Bushes & Shrubs
cs: Keře
da: Buske
de: Büsche & Sträucher
es: Arbustos y matas
fr: Buissons et arbustes
it: Arbusti e siepi
ja: 低木
nl: Struikgewas
no: Busker og vekster
pl: Krzaki i krzewy
pt: Arbustos
ru: Кусты и кустарники
sv: Buskar
tr: Çalılar

en: Landscaping & Garden Plants
xx: Landscaping & Garden Plants
cs: Venkovní a zahradní rostliny
da: Landskabs- og haveplanter
de: Pflanzen für Landschaftsbau & Garten
es: Plantas de jardín y paisajismo
fr: Aménagement paysager et plantes de jardin
it: Piante da giardino
ja: 造園・園芸植物
nl: Planten voor tuin en buitenruimte
no: Planter for park- og hageanlegg
pl: Rośliny ozdobne i ogrodowe
pt: Plantas para jardinagem e paisagismo
ru: Садовые растения и растения для благоустройства
sv: Växter för landskapsarkitektur och trädgård
tr: Bahçe ve Peyzaj Bitkileri

en: Potted Houseplants
xx: Potted Houseplants
cs: Domácí rostliny v květináčích
da: Potteplanter
de: Zimmerpflanzen im Topf
es: Plantas de interior en maceta
fr: Plantes d'intérieur en pot
it: Piante da interno in vaso
ja: 鉢植え観葉植物
nl: Kamerplanten
no: Potteplanter
pl: Rośliny doniczkowe
pt: Plantas no vaso
ru: Комнатные растения в горшках
sv: Krukväxter
tr: Saksı Çiçekleri

en: Plant & Herb Growing Kits
xx: Plant & Herb Growing Kits
cs: Sady na pěstování bylin a rostlin
da: Sæt til dyrkning af planter og urter
de: Pflanzen- & Kräuteranbausets
es: Kits para plantar flores y plantas
fr: Kits de plantation
it: Kit per coltivare piante ed erbe aromatiche
ja: 植物・ハーブ育成キット
nl: Plantenkweeksets
no: Sett til dyrking av planter og urter
pl: Zestawy do uprawy roślin i ziół
pt: Kits para cultivo de plantas e ervas
ru: Наборы для выращивания растений
sv: Kit för växt- och örtplantering
tr: Bitki Yetiştirme Teçhizatı

en: Seeds
xx: Seeds
cs: Semena
da: Frø
de: Saatgut
es: Semillas
fr: Graines
it: Semi
ja: 種子
nl: Zaden
no: Frø
pl: Nasiona
pt: Sementes
ru: Семена
sv: Frön
tr: Tohumlar

en: Plant & Flower Bulbs
xx: Plant & Flower Bulbs
cs: Cibule rostlin a květin
da: Plante- og blomsterløg
de: Pflanzen- & Blumenzwiebeln
es: Bulbos de flores y plantas
fr: Bulbes de plantes et de fleurs
it: Bulbi di piante e fiori
ja: 球根
nl: Bloembollen
no: Plante- og blomsterløker
pl: Cebulki roślin i kwiatów
pt: Bulbos de plantas e flores
ru: Луковицы растений и цветов
sv: Växt- och blomlökar
tr: Bitki ve Çiçek Soğanları

en: Seeds & Seed Tape
xx: Seeds & Seed Tape
cs: Semena a osivová páska
da: Frø og frøtape
de: Saatgut & Saatbänder
es: Semillas y cintas de semillas
fr: Graines et rubans de graines
it: Semi e sementi a nastro
ja: 種・シードテープ
nl: Zaden en zaadlint
no: Frøteip
pl: Nasiona i taśmy nasienne
pt: Sementes em fita
ru: Семена и семенные ленты
sv: Frön och fröband
tr: Tohumlar ve Tohum Bantları